Hawaii statutes.
§437D-8.5 Commissions. (a) No
lessor or officer, employee, agent, or other representative of the lessor shall
pay or receive a commission for selling damage waivers, except as provided in
subsection (b). Any violation of this section shall be an unfair or deceptive
act or practice as provided in section 480-2.

(b) As used in this section:

"Commission for selling damage
waivers" includes any compensation, bonus, award, or remuneration that
corresponds directly to the amount of sales of damage waivers.
"Commission for selling damage waivers" does not include any
compensation, bonus, award, or remuneration to an employee that corresponds to
the overall gross receipts of a sales location, where sales of damage waivers
are one of many factors contributing to overall gross receipts.

"Sales location" means any location
at which the employee worked or had oversight responsibility during the
applicable compensation period. [L 1990, c 209, pt of §1; am L 1991, c 227, §1;
am L 2003, c 155, §2; am L 2009, c 148, §7]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next